Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska76-2120
Applicability of other law.

A membership camping contract or an offer or a sale of a membership camping contract shall not be subject to the Securities Act of Nebraska or the Nebraska Time-Share Act.

Laws 1990, LB 656, § 20.

Nebraska Time-Share Act, see section 76-1701.

Securities Act of Nebraska, see section 8-1123.